Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-609
Improvements; power of city council.

The city council shall have power to open, control, name, rename, extend, widen, narrow, vacate, grade, curb, gutter, park, and pave or otherwise to improve and control and keep in good repair and condition, in any manner it may deem proper, any street, avenue, or alley, or public park or square, or part of either, within the limits of the city or within its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction, and it may grade partially or to the established grade, or park or otherwise improve any width or part of any such street, avenue, or alley. When the city vacates all or any portion of a street, avenue, or alley, or public park or square, or part of either, the city shall, within thirty days after the effective date of the vacation, file a certified copy of the vacating ordinance with the register of deeds for the county in which the vacated property is located to be indexed against all affected lots.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, LV, p. 259;

Laws 1901, c. 19, § 4, p. 307;

Laws 1907, c. 13, § 1, p. 111;

R.S.1913, § 4908;

C.S.1922, § 4076;

C.S.1929, § 16-605;

R.S.1943, § 16-609;

Laws 2001, LB 483, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 81.
July 21, 2016
Authority is conferred on cities of the first class to regulate parking of vehicles on the street. Vap v. City of McCook, 178 Neb. 844, 136 N.W.2d 220 (1965).

Grant of power to city to curb and pave street was a delegation of police power. Hillerege v. City of Scottsbluff, 164 Neb. 560, 83 N.W.2d 76 (1957).

While authority is conferred upon the municipality to control its streets, yet the discretion must be exercised in a reasonable and not in an arbitrary and discriminatory manner. State ex rel. Andruss v. Mayor & Council of City of North Platte, 120 Neb. 413, 233 N.W. 4 (1930).

The mere establishment of grade, without alteration, creates no damage and the statute of limitations does not commence to run against property owners' right by reason thereof, until there is actual alteration. Hilger v. City of Nebraska City, 97 Neb. 268, 149 N.W. 807 (1914).

The mere filing of petitions sufficient upon their face, without proof of such allegations, is not sufficient to confer jurisdiction upon the city to make the improvements and to assess the costs upon the abutting property, where the jurisdictional facts are put in issue, and injunction will restrain the taxes therefor. City of South Omaha v. Tighe, 67 Neb. 572, 93 N.W. 946 (1903).

The duty devolves on cities and towns to keep streets and sidewalks reasonably safe and fit for travel, and such duty applies to defects in construction, as well as neglect of repair. Village of Plainview v. Mendelson, 65 Neb. 85, 90 N.W. 956 (1902).